Hawaii, session 2025, HB907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii public housing authority to rehabilitate, remodel, renovate, and repair housing units. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii public housing authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________